Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 5. TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE B. ROAD AND ROAD UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 5202. NUECES COUNTY ROAD DISTRICT NO. 4

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 5202.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Nueces County Road District No. 4.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 1357), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT POWERS

Sec. 5202.051. AUTHORITY TO LEASE OR SELL LAND. The district may lease or sell land that is no longer used for district purposes.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 1357), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.